Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Teachers First Hired on or after July 1, 2006.
Sec. 14.25.485.
Occupational disability benefits and reemployment of disabled members.

A member is eligible for an occupational disability benefit if employment is terminated because of a total and apparently permanent occupational disability before the member’s normal retirement date.

The occupational disability benefits accrue beginning the first day of the month following termination of employment as a result of the disability and are payable the last day of the month. If a final determination granting the benefit is not made in time to pay the benefit when due, a retroactive payment shall be made to cover the period of deferment. The last payment shall be for the first month in which the disabled member

dies;

recovers from the disability;

fails to meet the requirements under (f), (h), or (k) of this section; or

reaches normal retirement age.

If the disabled member becomes ineligible to receive occupational disability benefits before the normal retirement date, the disabled member shall then be entitled to receive retirement benefits if the member would have been eligible for the benefit had employment continued during the period of disability. The period of disability constitutes membership service in regard to determining eligibility for retirement.

The monthly amount of an occupational disability benefit is 40 percent of the disabled member’s gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to disability. Notwithstanding AS

14.25.390(b)

, at the time a member is appointed to disability, the member becomes fully vested in the employer contributions made under AS

14.25.350(a)

. A disabled member is fully vested in the contributions to the member’s individual account made under this subsection. A member is not entitled to elect distributions from the member’s individual contribution account under AS

14.25.410

while the member is receiving disability benefits under this section. While a member is receiving disability benefits, based on the disabled member’s gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to disability, the employer shall make contributions to the

member’s individual account under AS

14.25.340

on behalf of the member, without deduction from the member’s disability payments; and

appropriate accounts and funds on behalf of the member under AS

14.25.350

.

A member is not entitled to an occupational disability benefit unless the member files an application for an occupational disability benefit with the administrator within 90 days after the date of terminating employment. If the member is unable to meet a filing requirement of this subsection, the filing requirement may be waived by the administrator if there are extraordinary circumstances that resulted in the member’s inability to meet the filing requirement.

A disabled member receiving an occupational disability benefit shall undergo a medical examination as often as the administrator considers advisable, but not more frequently than once each year. The administrator shall determine the place of the examination and engage the physician or physicians. If, in the judgment of the administrator, the examination indicates that the disabled member is no longer incapacitated because of a total and apparently permanent occupational disability, the administrator may not issue further disability benefits to the member.

A disabled member’s occupational disability benefit terminates the last day of the month in which the disabled member first qualifies for normal retirement. At that time, the member’s retirement benefit shall be determined under the provisions of AS

14.25.420

—

14.25.440

,

14.25.470

, and

14.25.480

. A member whose occupational disability benefit terminates under this subsection shall be considered to have retired directly from the plan.

A member appointed to disability benefits shall apply to the division of vocational rehabilitation of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development within 30 days after the date disability benefits commence. The member shall be enrolled in a rehabilitation program if the member meets the eligibility requirements of the division of vocational rehabilitation. Unless the member demonstrates cause, benefits shall terminate at the end of the first month in which a disabled member

fails to report to the division of vocational rehabilitation;

is certified by the division of vocational rehabilitation as failing to cooperate in a vocational rehabilitation program;

fails to interview for a job; or

fails to accept a position offered.

Upon the death of a disabled member who is receiving or is entitled to receive an occupational disability benefit, the administrator shall pay the surviving spouse a surviving spouse’s pension, equal to 40 percent of the member’s monthly compensation at the time of termination of employment because of occupational disability. If there is no surviving spouse, the administrator shall pay the survivor’s pension in equal parts to the dependent children of the member. While the monthly survivor’s pension is being paid, the survivor is not entitled to elect distributions from the member’s individual contribution account under AS

14.25.410

. The first payment of the surviving spouse’s pension or of a dependent child’s pension shall accrue from the first day of the month following the member’s death and is payable the last day of the month. The last payment shall be made the last day of the last month in which there is an eligible surviving spouse or dependent child, or the last day of the month in which the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived, whichever day is sooner. A retirement benefit shall be determined under the provisions of AS

14.25.420

—

14.25.440

,

14.25.470

, and

14.25.480

based on the date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived. In addition to the payment of the member’s individual account, the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the surviving dependent children of the member, shall receive an additional benefit in an amount equal to the accumulated contributions that would have been made to the deceased member’s individual account under AS

14.25.340(a)

and

14.25.350(a)

, based on the deceased member’s gross monthly compensation at the time of occupational disability, from the time of the member’s death to the date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived. Earnings shall be allocated to the additional benefit calculated under this subsection based on the actual rate of return, net of expenses, of the trust account established under AS

14.25.350(e)

over the period that the contributions would have been made. This additional amount and allocated earnings shall be paid in the same manner as determined for the member’s individual account under AS

14.25.420

—

14.25.460

to the extent permitted by the Internal Revenue Service. For the purpose of determining eligibility of a survivor who is receiving a benefit under this subsection for medical benefits under AS

14.25.470

and

14.25.480

, a member who died while receiving disability benefits shall be considered to have retired directly from the plan on the date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived. The period during which the member was eligible for a disability benefit and the period during which a survivor’s pension is paid to a survivor under this subsection each constitute membership service for the purposes of determining eligibility for medical benefits under AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

and AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

.

While a survivor under (i) of this section is receiving a survivor’s pension, the employer of the deceased member shall make contributions with respect to the survivor based on the deceased member’s gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to disability

that would have been paid to the member’s individual account under AS

14.25.340

and

14.25.350(a)

to the trust account established under AS

14.25.350(e)

, without deduction from the survivor’s pension; and

to the appropriate accounts and funds under AS

14.25.350(b)

— (e).

In this section, “occupational disability” means a physical or mental condition that the administrator determines presumably permanently prevents an employee from satisfactorily performing the employee’s usual duties or the duties of another comparable position or job available to the employee and for which the employee is qualified by training or education; however, the proximate cause of the condition must be a bodily injury sustained, or a hazard undergone, while in the performance and within the scope of the employee’s duties and not the proximate result of the wilful negligence of the employee.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 26 — 31 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (j) was enacted as (k); relettered in 2007, at which time former subsection (j) was relettered as (k) and the reference in (b)(3) was conformed.

Administrative Code. —

For administration of the defined benefits plan ( AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 2.

Sec. 14.25.486.
Disability benefit adjustment.

Once each year, the administrator shall increase disability benefits. The amount of the increase is a percentage of the current disability benefit equal to the lesser of 75 percent of the increase in the cost of living in the preceding calendar year or nine percent.

If a disabled member was not receiving a benefit during the entire preceding calendar year, the increase in the benefit under this section shall be adjusted by multiplying it by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of months for which the benefit was received in the preceding calendar year and the denominator of which is 12.

An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of each year and is based on the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for urban wage earners and clerical workers for Anchorage, Alaska, during the previous calendar year, as determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

Benefit adjustments under this section shall terminate the last day of the month following the date on which a disabled member is no longer receiving a disability benefit under AS

14.25.485

.

History.

(§ 32 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 14.25.487.
Occupational death benefit.

If (1) the death of a member occurs before the member’s retirement and before the member’s normal retirement date, (2) the proximate cause of death is a bodily injury sustained or a hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the member’s duties, and (3) the injury or hazard is not the proximate result of wilful negligence of the member, a monthly survivor’s pension shall be paid to the surviving spouse. If there is no surviving spouse or if the spouse later dies, the monthly survivor’s pension shall be paid in equal parts to the dependent children of the member.

The first payment of the surviving spouse’s pension or of a dependent child’s pension shall be made for the month following the month in which the member dies. Payments shall cease on the last day of the month in which there is no longer an eligible spouse or eligible dependent child, or the last day of the month following the earliest date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived, whichever day is sooner.

The monthly survivor’s pension in (b) of this section for survivors of members is 40 percent of the member’s monthly compensation in the month in which the member dies. While the monthly survivor’s pension is being paid, the survivor is not entitled to elect distributions from the member’s individual contribution account under AS

14.25.410

, except as required by AS

14.25.440

. While the monthly survivor’s pension is being paid, the employer shall make contributions with respect to the member’s surviving spouse and member’s surviving dependent children based on the deceased member’s gross monthly compensation at the time of occupational death

that would have been paid to the member’s individual account under AS

14.25.340

and

14.25.350(a)

, to the trust account established under AS

14.25.350(e)

, without deduction from the survivor’s pension; and

to the appropriate accounts and funds under AS

14.25.350(b)

— (e).

If a member’s death is caused by an act of assault, assassination, or terrorism directly related to the person’s status as a member, whether the act occurs on or off the member’s job site, the death shall be considered to have occurred in the performance of and within the scope of the member’s duties for purposes of (a)(2) of this section. If the expressed or apparent motive and intent of the perpetrator of the harm inflicted upon the member was due to the performance of the member’s job duties or employment, the death shall be considered to be directly related to the member’s status as a member. A member’s job duties are those performed within the course and scope of the person’s employment with an employer.

On the date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived, the retirement benefit shall be determined under the provisions of AS

14.25.420

—

14.25.440

,

14.25.470

, and

14.25.480

. In addition to payment of the member’s individual account, the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the surviving dependent children of the member, shall receive an additional benefit in an amount equal to the accumulated contributions that would have been made to the deceased member’s individual account under AS

14.25.340(a)

and

14.25.350(a)

, based on the deceased member’s gross monthly compensation at the time of the member’s occupational death, from the time of the member’s death to the date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived. Earnings shall be allocated to the additional benefit calculated under this subsection based on the actual rate of return, net of expenses, of the trust account established under AS

14.25.350(e)

over the period that the contributions would have been made. This additional amount and allocated earnings shall be paid in the same manner as determined for the member’s individual account under AS

14.25.420

—

14.25.460

to the extent permitted by the Internal Revenue Service. A member who died and whose survivors receive occupational death benefits under this section shall be considered to have retired directly from the plan on the date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived. The period during which a survivor’s pension is paid under this subsection constitutes membership service for the purposes of determining vesting in employer contributions under AS

14.25.390(b)

and eligibility for medical benefits under AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

and AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 33 — 35 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of the defined benefits plan ( AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 2.

Sec. 14.25.488.
Survivors’ pension adjustment.

Once each year, the administrator shall increase payments to a person 60 years of age or older receiving a survivor’s pension under AS

14.25.485(i)

or

14.25.487(c)

and to a person who has received a survivor’s pension under AS

14.25.485(i)

or

14.25.487(c)

for at least eight years, who is not otherwise eligible for an increase under this section.

The amount of the increase is a percentage of the current survivor’s pension equal to the lesser of 50 percent of the increase in the cost of living in the preceding calendar year or six percent.

If a survivor was not receiving a pension during the entire preceding calendar year, the increase in the survivor’s pension under this section shall be adjusted by multiplying it by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of months for which the pension was received in the preceding calendar year and the denominator of which is 12.

The administrator shall increase the initial survivor’s pension paid to a survivor of a member who died while receiving disability benefits by a percentage equal to the total cumulative percentage that has been applied to the member’s disability benefit under AS

14.25.486

.

An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of each year and is based on the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for urban wage earners and clerical workers for Anchorage, Alaska, during the previous calendar year, as determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

Pension adjustments under this section shall terminate the last day of the month following the date on which a survivor is no longer receiving a survivor’s pension under AS

14.25.485(i)

or

14.25.487(c)

.

History.

(§ 36 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 14.25.489.
Premiums for retiree major medical insurance coverage upon termination of disability benefits or survivor’s pension.

The premium for retiree major medical insurance coverage payable by a member whose disability benefit is terminated under AS

14.25.485(g)

or by an eligible survivor whose survivor pension is terminated under AS

14.25.485(i)

or

14.25.487(e)

when the member would have been eligible for normal retirement if the member had survived shall be determined under AS

14.25.480(g)(2)

as if the member or survivor were eligible for Medicare.

History.

(§ 36 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 14.25.490.
Amendment and termination of plan.

The state has the right to amend the plan at any time and from time to time, in whole or in part, including the right to make retroactive amendments referred to in 26 U.S.C. 401(b).

The plan administrator may not modify or amend the plan retroactively in such a manner as to reduce the benefits of any member accrued to date under the plan by reason of contributions made before the modification or amendment except to the extent that the reduction is permitted by the Internal Revenue Code.

The state may, in its discretion, terminate the plan in whole or part at any time without liability for the termination. If the plan is terminated, all investments remain in force until all individual accounts have been completely distributed under the plan, and, after all plan liabilities are satisfied, excess assets revert to the employer.

Any contribution made by an employer to the plan because of a mistake of fact must be returned to the employer by the administrator within one year after the contribution or discovery, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.25.500.
Exclusive benefit.

The corpus or income of the assets held in trust as required by the plan may not be diverted or used for other than the exclusive benefit of the participants.

If plan benefits are provided through the distribution of annuity or insurance contracts, any refunds or credits in excess of plan benefits due to dividends, earnings, or other experience rating credits, or surrender or cancellation credits, shall be paid to the trust fund.

The assets of the plan may not be used to pay premiums or contributions of the employer under another plan maintained by the employer.

The administrator shall use forfeitures in the fixed benefit account of the plan that arise for any reason, including from termination of employment or death, to reduce employer contributions. Forfeitures may not be applied to increase the benefits of any member.

The administrator shall determine the amount of any fixed benefit that is determined on the basis of actuarial tables using assumptions approved by the commissioner. The amount of benefits is not subject to employer discretion.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 37 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective June 7, 2007, added subsections (d) and (e).

Sec. 14.25.510.
Nonguarantee of returns, rates, or benefit amounts.

The plan created by AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

is, with respect to individual accounts, treated as a defined contribution plan, and not a defined benefit plan. The amount of money in the individual account of a participant depends on the amount of contributions and the rate of return from investments of the account that varies over time. If benefits are paid in the form of an annuity, the benefit amount payable is dependent on the amount of money in the account and the interest rates applied and service fees charged by the annuity payor at the time the annuity is purchased from the carrier and benefits are first paid. Nothing in this plan guarantees a participant

a rate of return or interest rate other than that actually earned by the account of the participant, less applicable administrative expenses; or

an annuity based on interest rates or service charges other than interest rates available from and service charges by the annuity payor in effect at the time the annuity is paid.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 38 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective June 7, 2007, inserted “with respect to individual accounts, treated as” and “and” in the first sentence, inserted “individual” in the second sentence, and inserted “the annuity is purchased from the carrier and” in the third sentence.

Sec. 14.25.520.
Nonguarantee of employment.

The provisions of AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

are not a contract of employment between an employer and an employee, nor do they confer a right of an employee to be continued in the employment of an employer, nor are they a limitation of the right of an employer to discharge an employee with or without cause.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.25.530.
Fraud.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement or falsifies or permits to be falsified a record of this plan in an attempt to defraud the plan is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.25.532.
Pension forfeiture.

The provisions of AS

37.10.310

apply to pension benefits under AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 14.25.540.
Transfer into defined contribution retirement plan by nonvested members of defined benefit retirement plan.

Subject to (i) of this section, an active member of the defined benefit retirement plan of the teachers’ retirement system is eligible to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan established under AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

if that member has not vested. Participation in the defined contribution retirement plan is in lieu of participation in the defined benefit retirement plan established under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

.

A member who has vested in a defined benefit retirement plan is not eligible to transfer under this section.

Each eligible member who elects to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan shall have transferred to a new account the member contribution account balance held in trust for the member under the defined benefit retirement plan of the teachers’ retirement system. A matching employer contribution shall be made on behalf of that employee to the new account. The employer shall make the matching contribution from funds other than the trust funds of the defined benefit retirement plan. The amount of the matching employer contribution is subject to, and may not exceed, the limitation of 26 U.S.C. 415(c) during the applicable limitation year as defined in AS

14.25.590

. If the matching employer contribution would exceed the limits during the limitation year in which the transfer occurs, the remaining amount of the matching employer contribution shall be made in the next limitation year, if the limits would not be exceeded.

Upon a transfer, all membership service previously earned under the defined benefit retirement plan shall be nullified for purposes of entitlement to a future benefit under the defined benefit retirement plan but shall be credited for purposes of determining vesting in employer contributions under AS

14.25.390(b)

and eligibility to elect medical benefits under AS

14.25.470

. Membership service allowed for credit toward medical benefits does not include any service credit purchased under AS

14.25.075

for employment by an employer who is not a participating employer in this chapter.

An eligible member whose accounts are subject to a qualified domestic relations order may not make an election to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan under this subsection unless the qualified domestic relations order is amended or vacated and court-certified copies of the order are received by the administrator.

As directed by the participant, the board shall transfer or cause to be transferred the appropriate amounts to the designated account. The board shall establish transfer procedures by regulation, but the actual transfer may not be later than 30 days after the effective date of the member’s participation in the defined contribution retirement plan unless the major financial markets for securities available for a transfer are seriously disrupted by an unforeseen event that also causes the suspension of trading on any national securities exchange in the country where the securities were issued. In that event, the 30-day period of time may be extended by a resolution of the board of trustees. Transfers are not commissionable or subject to other fees and may be in the form of securities or cash as determined by the board. Securities shall be valued as of the date of receipt in the participant’s account.

If the board or the administrator receives notification from the United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, that this section or a portion of this section will cause the retirement system under this chapter, or a portion of the retirement system under this chapter, to be disqualified for tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code, the portion that will cause the disqualification does not apply, and the board and the administrator shall notify the presiding officers of the legislature.

A member who is eligible to elect transfer to the defined contribution retirement plan must make the election not later than 12 months after the first day of the month following the administrator’s receipt of the notification that the member’s employer consents to transfers of its members under (i) of this section. The election to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan must be made in writing on forms and in the manner prescribed by the administrator. Before accepting an election to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan, the administrator must provide the employee planning on making an election to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan with information, including calculations to illustrate the effect of moving the employee’s retirement plan from the defined benefit retirement plan to the defined contribution retirement plan as well as other information to clearly inform the employee of the potential consequences of the employee’s election. An election made under this subsection to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan is irrevocable. Upon making the election, the participant shall be enrolled as a member of the defined contribution retirement plan, the member’s participation in the plan shall be governed by the provisions of AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

, and the member’s participation in the defined benefit retirement plan under AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

shall terminate. The participant’s enrollment in the defined contribution retirement plan shall be effective the first day of the month after the administrator receives the completed enrollment forms. An election made by an eligible member who is married is not effective unless the election is signed by the individual’s spouse.

A member may make an election under this section only if the member’s employer participates in both the defined benefit retirement plan and the defined contribution retirement plan and consents to transfers under this section. The employer shall notify the administrator if the employer consents to allowing the employer’s members to choose to transfer from the defined benefit retirement plan to the defined contribution retirement plan under this section. An employer’s notice to allow transfers is irrevocable and applicable to all eligible employees of the employer.

In this section,

“defined benefit retirement plan” means the retirement plan established in AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

;

“defined contribution retirement plan” means the retirement plan established in AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 39 — 41 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of the defined benefits plan ( AS

14.25.009

—

14.25.220

), see 2 AAC 36, art. 2.

Sec. 14.25.550.
Membership in teachers’ and public employees’ retirement systems.

A person who is employed at least half-time in the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan (AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

) during the same period that the person is employed at least half-time in a position in the teachers’ defined contribution retirement plan (AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

) shall receive credited service under each plan for half-time employment. However, the amount of credited service a person receives under the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan during a school year may not exceed the amount necessary, when added to the amount of credited service earned during the school year under the teachers’ defined contribution retirement plan, to equal one year of credited service.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.25.560.
Legislators who have been teachers.

A state legislator who was an active member of the defined contribution plan under other sections of AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

within the 12 months immediately preceding election to office may, subject to the requirements of (b) of this section, elect to be an active member of the teachers’ defined contribution retirement plan for as long as the state legislator serves continuously as a state legislator if, within 90 days after taking the oath of office,

the state legislator directs the employer in writing to

pay into this plan the employer contributions required for a member under AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

; and

deduct from the state legislator’s salary and pay into this plan

the employee contributions required for a member under AS 14.25.310 — 14.25.590; and

an amount equal to the difference between the total employer and state contributions required for a member under AS 14.25.310 — 14.25.590 and the employer contributions that would be required under the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan (AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

) if the legislator were covered under that plan; and

notice is given the administrator in writing.

A state legislator is not entitled to elect membership under (a) of this section if the state legislator is covered for the same period of service under the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan (AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

). An election of membership under (a) of this section is retroactive to the date the state legislator took the oath of office. A state legislator may not receive membership credit under (a) of this section for legislative service performed before the legislative session during which the state legislator elected membership under (a) of this section. In order to continue in membership service under (a) of this section, the state legislator must earn at least 0.3 years of membership service under other sections of AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

during each five-year period.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.25.570.
Participation by National Education Association employees. [Repealed, § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

Sec. 14.25.580.
Participation by Special Education Service Agency employees.

An employee of the Special Education Service Agency may participate in the system under this chapter if the employee possesses or is eligible to possess a teacher certificate under AS

14.20.020

.

History.

(§ 35 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 14.25.582.
Special rules for treatment of qualified military service.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

, with respect to qualified military service, contributions shall be made and benefits and service credit shall be provided in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 414(u).

To the extent required by 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(37), if a member dies while performing qualified military service, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 43, the survivors of the member are entitled to any additional benefits that would have been provided to the survivors under the plan had the member resumed employment and then terminated employment on account of death. For purposes of this section, periods of qualified military service are not included in calculations of credited service.

Consistent with and to the extent required by 26 U.S.C. 414(u)(12), a member receiving differential wage payments from an employer shall be treated as employed by that employer, and the differential wage payment shall be treated as compensation for purposes of applying the limits on annual additions under 26 U.S.C. 415(c). For purposes of this subsection, “differential wage payment” means any payment that

is made by an employer to an individual with respect to any period during which the individual is performing service in the uniformed services, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 43, while on active duty for a period of more than 30 days; and

represents all or a portion of the wages the individual would have received from the employer if the individual were performing service for the employer.

History.

(§ 42 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 102, SLA 2014, adding subsections (b) and (c) to this section, see 2014 Senate Journal 1469 — 1470.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 29, 2014, added (b), retroactive to January 1, 2007, and (c), retroactive to January 1, 2009.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 11, ch. 102, SLA 2014, subsection (b) is retroactive to January 1, 2007, and subsection (c) is retroactive to January 1, 2009.

Subsections (b) and (c) of this section, as introduced by the governor and passed by the legislature, refer to 38 U.S.C. 43 but this statute does not exist. It is possible that this reference was intended to refer to 38 U.S.C. 4301 — 4335.